Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2303
Officers; secretary; duties.

Members of the air conditioning air distribution board shall, within ten days after their appointments, meet in their respective city or village building or place designated by the city council, city manager, or village board of trustees and organize by the selection of one of their members as chairperson, one as vice-chairperson, and one as secretary. It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep full, true, and correct minutes and records of all meetings, applications for examinations, examinations given and results thereof, and certificates issued, which records shall be open for free inspection by all persons during business hours.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 3, p. 469;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 147.
August 28, 2021